Maryland, session 2026, SB0475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–926.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “CREATIVE EXPRESSION” MEANS THE
EXPRESSION OR APPLICATION OF CREATIVITY OR IMAGINATION IN THE
PRODUCTION OR ARRANGEMENT OF FORMS, SOUNDS, WORDS, MOVEMENTS, OR
SYMBOLS THAT IS ELIGIBLE FOR FEDERAL COPYRIGHT PROTECTION UNDER 17
U.S.C. § 102.
(2) “CREATIVE EXPRESSION” INCLUDES:
(I) MUSIC;
(II) DANCE;
(III) PERFORMANCE ART;
(IV) VISUAL ART;
(V) POETRY;
(VI) LITERATURE; AND
(VII) FILM.
(B) IN ANY CRIMINAL PROCEEDING OR JUVENILE PROCEEDING, THE
CREATIVE EXPRESSION OF A DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT IS NOT ADMISSIBLE
AGAINST THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT UNLESS THE COURT FINDS, BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, THAT:
(1) (I) THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT INTENDED THE
CREATIVE EXPRESSION TO BE LITERAL, RATHER THAN FIGURATIVE OR FICTIONAL;
OR
(II) IF THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION IS DERIVATIVE, THE
DEFENDANT INTENDED TO ADOPT THE LITERAL MEANING OF THE CREATIVE
EXPRESSION AS THEIR OWN;

SENATE BILL 475 3
(2) THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION REFERS TO THE SPECIFIC FACTS OF
THE ALLEGED OFFENSE; AND THERE IS A CLOSE TEMPORAL AND FACTUAL NEXUS
BETWEEN THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION AND THE ALLEGED OFFENSE;
(3) THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION IS RELEVANT TO A DISPUTED ISSUE
OF FACT.; AND
(4) THE PROBATIVE VALUE OF THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION
OUTWEIGHS ITS PREJUDICIAL EFFECT.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PRECLUDES THE ADMISSION OF CREATIVE
EXPRESSION IN JUVENILE CASES FOR THE PURPOSES OF EVALUATING,
RECOMMENDING, OR ORDERING REFERRAL TO MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES OR
DIVERSION PROGRAMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.